Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1209
Witnesses; answer subjecting to civil liability; not privileged.

A witness is not excused from answering a question upon the mere ground that he would be thereby subject to a civil liability.

R.S.1867, Code § 336, p. 450;

R.S.1913, § 7901;

C.S.1922, § 8843;

C.S.1929, § 20-1209;

R.S.1943, § 25-1209.